Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.200

Insolvency and liquidation—Chapter 30.44 RCW.

*Chapter 30.44 RCW applies to the insolvency and liquidation of a business development company organized under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 87 s 21.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.44 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.44 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.